inc/noun_affixes.lexc
! noun-an-affixes.lexc

Multichar_Symbols

+N
+A
+I
+D

+Sg
+Pl
+Obv
+Loc
+Distr

+Der/Dim

+Px1Sg
+Px2Sg
+Px3Sg
+Px1Pl
+Px21Pl
+Px2Pl
+Px3Pl
+Px4Sg/Pl
+PxX

! Marking the continuation of Dependent noun status for Derived Diminutive nouns
@P.dep.DEP@
@R.dep.DEP@
@D.dep.DEP@

@U.person.NI@
@P.person.NI@
@R.person.NI@
@U.person.KI@
@P.person.KI@
@R.person.KI@
@U.person.O@
@P.person.O@
@R.person.O@
@D.person.O@
@U.person.MI@
@P.person.MI@
@R.person.MI@
@D.person.MI@
@U.person.NULL@
@P.person.NULL@
@R.person.NULL@
@D.person.NULL@

@U.sg.I@
@U.sg.A@
@P.sg.I@
@P.sg.A@
@R.sg.I@
@R.sg.A@
@D.sg.I@
@D.sg.I@
@D.sg@
@C.sg@

@P.number.SG@
@D.number.SG@
@P.number.PL@
@D.number.PL@

@U.poss.IM@
@P.poss.IM@
@R.poss.IM@
@D.poss.IM@
@U.poss.NULL@
@P.poss.NULL@
@R.poss.NULL@
@D.poss.NULL@
@U.poss.PL@
@R.poss.PL@
@D.poss.PL@
@D.poss@

! Marking diminutive suffix type, when only one is possible
! Otherwise, both diminutives are generated/accepted
@U.is.IS@
@P.is.IS@
@R.is.IS@
@D.is.IS@
@U.isis.ISIS@
@P.isis.ISIS@
@R.isis.ISIS@
@D.isis.ISIS@

! Marking lexicalized diminutive stems so that they cannot be rediminutivized
@P.dim.DIM@
@R.dim.DIM@
@D.dim@

! Marking animate nouns that cannot take the locative suffix
@P.loc.NULL@
@D.loc.NULL@

! Special characters for matching TWOLC  morphonological rules 
i2
i4
t2
t3
w2
w3
y4
%<
%>

%^DIM

LEXICON Root
NOUN_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON NOUN_PREFIXES
NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES ;
NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_PREFIXES ;
NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit2%<  NOUN_INDEP_STEMS ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit2%<  NOUN_INDEP_STEMS ;
@P.person.O@:@P.person.O@ot2%<     NOUN_INDEP_STEMS ;
@P.person.NULL@                    NOUN_INDEP_STEMS ;

LEXICON NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@ni4%<   NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@ki4%<   NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS ;
@P.person.O@:@P.person.O@w3%<      NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS ;

LEXICON NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@ni4%<       NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_STEMS ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@ki4%<       NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_STEMS ;
@P.person.O@:@P.person.O@w3%<          NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_STEMS ;
@P.person.MI@0:@P.person.MI@0mi4%< NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_STEMS ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Here we go to the NA stems !
! Currently test cases below !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! Here we start with the general morphosyntactic features in a standardized order

LEXICON NA
+N+A:0 NA_POSS_IM_0_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON NAD
@P.dep.DEP@+N+A+D:@P.dep.DEP@0 NA_POSS_IM_0_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON NI
+N+I:0 NI_POSS_IM_0_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON NID
@P.dep.DEP@+N+I+D:@P.dep.DEP@0 NI_POSS_IM_0_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON NA_POSS_IM_0_SUFFIX
@D.person.NULL@@R.poss.IM@:@D.person.NULL@@R.poss.IM@%>i2m NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
@D.person.NULL@@D.poss.IM@                                 NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.person.NULL@                                            NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NA_DIM_SUFFIXES
NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! Independent NAs
@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+A:@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMs   NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+A:@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMsis         NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! Dependent NAs
@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+A+D:@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMs NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+A+D:@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMsis       NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI_POSS_IM_0_SUFFIX
@D.person.NULL@@R.poss.IM@:@D.person.NULL@@R.poss.IM@%>i2m NI_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
@D.person.NULL@@D.poss.IM@                                 NI_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.person.NULL@                                            NI_DIM_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI_DIM_SUFFIXES
NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! Independent NIs
@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+I:@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMs NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+I:@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMsis       NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! Dependent NIs
@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+I+D:@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMs NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+I+D:@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMsis       NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NA_POSS_SUFFIXES
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0 NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0 NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg:@U.person.O@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@                    NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@%>i2nân  NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px21Pl:@U.person.KI@%>i2naw NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@%>i2wâw  NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Pl:@U.person.O@0%>i2wâw   NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Obviative possessor
@U.person.O@+Px4Sg/Pl:@U.person.O@%>i2yiw NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Unspeficied possessor
@U.person.MI@+PxX:@U.person.MI@0        NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@D.loc.NULL@ NA_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NA_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2hk ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2hk ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2hk   ENDLEX ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2nâhk  ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px21Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2nâhk ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2wâhk  ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@0%>i2wâhk   ENDLEX ;
! Obviative possessor
@U.person.O@+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2yihk ENDLEX ;
! Unspeficied possessor
@U.person.MI@+PxX+Loc:@U.person.MI@%>i2hk          ENDLEX ;
@U.person.MI@+PxX+Distr:@U.person.MI@%>i2nâhk      ENDLEX ;

! POSS IM SG   SUFF
! 12   -  A    -a
! 3    -  A    -a
! 12   +  A    -im-0
! 3    +  A    -im-a
! 12   +  0    -im-0
! 3    +  0    -im-a

LEXICON NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES
! Singular
@D.number.PL@ NA_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG ;
! Obviative
@R.person.NULL@+Obv:@R.person.NULL@%>a ENDLEX ; ! non-possessed, obviative -a
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.poss.IM@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.poss.IM@%>a ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, im-poss, obviative -a
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.poss.IM@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.poss.IM@%>a ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, 0-poss, obviative -a
@D.person.NULL@@R.person.O@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@R.person.O@%>a ENDLEX ; ! 3rd possession, 0/im-poss, obviative -a
! Plural
@D.number.SG@@D.person.O@+Pl:@D.number.SG@@D.person.O@%>ak ENDLEX ; ! Non 3rd possessed (non-possessed), plural -ak
! Locative
@D.loc.NULL@@R.person.NULL@+Loc:@D.loc.NULL@@R.person.NULL@%>i2hk ENDLEX ;
@R.person.NULL@+Distr:@R.person.NULL@%>i2nâhk ENDLEX ;

LEXICON NA_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG
@R.person.NULL@@D.sg@+Sg:@R.person.NULL@@D.sg@0 ENDLEX ; ! No possession, no singular suffix
@R.person.NULL@@R.sg.A@+Sg:@R.person.NULL@@R.sg.A@%>a ENDLEX ; ! No possession, a-singular (possessive suffix -im ruled out earlier)
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.poss.IM@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.poss.IM@0 ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, im-poss, 0-singular
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.poss.IM@@D.sg@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.poss.IM@@D.sg@0 ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, 0-poss, 0-singular
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.poss.IM@@R.sg.A@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.poss.IM@@R.sg.A@%>a ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, 0-poss, a-singular

LEXICON NI_POSS_SUFFIXES
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0 NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0 NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg:@U.person.O@0   NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@                    NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@@U.poss.PL@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@@U.poss.PL@%>i2nân  NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@@U.poss.PL@+Px21Pl:@U.person.KI@@U.poss.PL@%>i2naw NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@@U.poss.PL@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@@U.poss.PL@%>i2wâw  NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@@U.poss.PL@+Px3Pl:@U.person.O@@U.poss.PL@0%>i2wâw   NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Obviative possessor
@U.person.O@@U.poss.PL@+Px4Sg/Pl:@U.person.O@@U.poss.PL@%>i2yiw NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Unspecified possessor
@U.person.MI@+PxX:@U.person.MI@0        NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
NI_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2hk  ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2hk ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2hk   ENDLEX ;
! @U.person.NULL@                    NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2nâhk  ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px21Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2nâhk ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2wâhk  ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@0%>i2wâhk   ENDLEX ;
! Obviative possessor
@U.person.O@+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2yihk ENDLEX ;
! Unspecified possessor
@U.person.MI@+PxX+Loc:@U.person.MI@%>i2hk ENDLEX ;

LEXICON NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES
@D.number.PL@ NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG ; 
@D.number.SG@+Pl:@D.number.SG@%>a ENDLEX ;
@R.person.NULL@+Loc:@R.person.NULL@%>i2hk ENDLEX ;

LEXICON NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG
@D.sg@+Sg:@D.sg@0 ENDLEX ; ! Zero Sg morpheme for non NI-4w cases
@R.person.NULL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@R.person.NULL@@R.sg.I@%>i ENDLEX ; ! -i-singular (NI-4w), when no other morphology
@D.person.NULL@@R.poss.IM@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@R.poss.IM@@R.sg.I@0    ENDLEX ; ! 0-singular (NI-4w), when -im-poss
@D.person.NULL@@D.poss.IM@@R.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.poss.IM@@R.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@0 ENDLEX ; ! 0-singular (NI-4w), when singular possession and 0-im
@D.person.NULL@@D.poss.IM@@D.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.poss.IM@@D.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@%>i ENDLEX ; ! -i-singular (NI-4w), when singular possession and 0-im

! ----------
! Test cases for various noun stem types
! To eventually be moved to under: src/morphology/stems/nouns*.lexc
! ----------

! LEXICON N_INDEP_STEMS
! @U.poss.NULL@ NA_0_STEMS ; ! NA stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! @U.poss.IM@   NA_IM_STEMS ; ! NA stems that require -im in possession
! @U.poss.NULL@ NI_0_STEMS ; ! NI stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! @U.poss.IM@   NI_IM_STEMS ; ! NI stems that require -im in possession - likely do not exist
! 
! LEXICON NA_0_STEMS
! astotin NA ;
! 
! LEXICON NA_IM_STEMS
! âmow NA "bee" ;
! sîsîp NA "duck" ;
! 
! LEXICON NI_0_STEMS
! askiy NI "land" ;
! astotin NI "hat" ;
! mâcîs NI "camp" ;
!
! LEXICON NI_IM_STEMS
! xxx NI "yyy" ;
! xxx NI "yyy" ;

! LEXICON N_DEP_NONKIN_STEMS
! @U.poss.NULL@ NAD_0_NONKIN_STEMS ; ! NAD stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! @U.poss.NULL@ NID_0_NONKIN_STEMS ; ! NID stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! 
! LEXICON NAD_0_NONKIN_STEMS
! masakay:asakay NAD "skin" ;
! 
! LEXICON NID_0_NONKIN_STEMS
! mihtawakay:htawakay NID "ear" ;
! mispiton:spiton NID "arm" ;
!
! LEXICON N_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS
! @U.poss.NULL@ NAD_0_KINSHIP_STEMS ; ! NAD stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! ! @U.poss.NULL@ NI_0_KINSHIP_STEMS ; ! The are no NID kinship stems
!
! LEXICON NAD_0_KINSHIP_STEMS
! -ohkom:ohkom NAD "grand-mother" ;
! -ôhtawiy:ôhtawiy NAD "father" ;
! -tânis:tânis NAD "daughter, brother, sister" ;

!!! Alternative via setting flag-diacritics via case-specific continuation classes
! IM: default without -im, needs to be required.
! DIM: default with both -is and -isis, either one needs to be required

! NA 
! LEXICON NA_0
! @P.poss.NULL@@P.is.IS@@P.isis.ISIS@ NA ;
